Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201668-975
Department; apply for amendment to medicaid state plan; multisystemic therapy for youth.

(1) On or before May 1, 2016, the department shall submit an application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to amend the medicaid state plan to provide for utilization of money to allow for payments for multisystemic therapy for youth who are eligible for the medical assistance program and CHIP pursuant to the federal Children's Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act of 2009, Public Law 111-3, as such act existed on January 1, 2015.

(2) For purposes of this section, CHIP means the Children's Health Insurance Program established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq., as such section existed on January 1, 2015.

Laws 2015, LB500, § 2.